Louisiana, session 2026, SB456.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:1384(A) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 11:551(C),
(D), and (E) and 566(C) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§551. Eligibility for membership
* * *
C. The provisions of Subsection B of this Section shall not be applicable
to the provisions of R.S. 11:566 or 1384 concerning retired judges serving on
assignment.
D. For purposes of this Subpart, "membership in one of the state
systems" shall mean and include the initial date the judge or court officer
became a member in any public retirement system, plan, or fund.
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any member
subject to the provisions of this Subpart shall be authorized to make an
irrevocable election within thirty days of employment for their membership
service, retirement eligibility and benefits, and contributions to be limited to
that of a regular member of this system. Any election pursuant to this
Subsection shall be made on forms promulgated by the system for this purpose.
* * *
§566. Assigned judges
* * *
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 456 ENROLLED
supreme court may elect to apply the provisions of R.S. 11:1384 to
appointments made pursuant to this Section or under its inherent constitutional
authority.
* * *
§1384. Assigned retired judges; optional method of compensation, expenses
A.(1) In lieu of the compensation established for assigned retired judges by
R.S. 11:566 and R.S. 11:1351 through 1358, the supreme court may assign a retired
judge to a court on a contractual or per diem basis. In such case, and notwithstanding
any provision of R.S. 11:1381 or 443 or any other provision of law to the contrary,
the assigned retired judge shall be entitled to compensation, in addition to his
retirement pay, in an amount equal to one-twentieth of the monthly salary of a judge
of the court to which he is assigned for each day of service under such assignment,
but not to exceed one hundred twenty working or judicial days in a fiscal year. In
addition, such a judge shall be entitled to reimbursement of reasonable and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of such service. The assignment of a retired
judge under this section Section shall not result in the suspension or termination of
his pension or retirement status as provided by R.S. 11:1381 or any other provision
of law.
(2) The supreme court may set the compensation payable to an assigned
retired judge at an amount lower than the amount specified in Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection. If the compensation claimed and payable does not exceed
three-fifths of the amount otherwise authorized in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, then the annual limitation on the number of working or judicial
days provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not apply.
* * *
Section 2. Nothing in this Act shall reduce an employee contribution rate otherwise
established by law. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contribution in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 456 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.